Illinois, session 104th, SB1594.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 5Act is amended by changing Section 3.255 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 50/3.255)7    Sec. 3.255. Public Health and Emergency Medical Plan 8Emergency Medical Disaster Plan. The Department shall develop 9and implement a Public Health and Emergency Medical Plan an 10Emergency Medical Disaster Plan to assist emergency medical 11services personnel and health care facilities in working 12together in a collaborative way and to provide support in 13situations where local medical resources are overwhelmed, 14including but not limited to public health emergencies, as 15that term is defined in Section 4 of the Illinois Emergency 16Management Agency Act. As part of the plan, the Department may 17designate lead hospitals in each Emergency Medical Services 18region established under this Act and may foster the creation 19and coordination of volunteer medical response teams that can 20be deployed to assist when a locality's capacity is 21overwhelmed. In developing a Public Health and Emergency 22Medical Plan an Emergency Medical Disaster Plan, the 23Department shall collaborate with the entities listed in   SB1594 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10740 BAB 20819 b1Sections 2310-50.5 and 2310-620 of the Department of Public 2Health Powers and Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code 3of Illinois.4(Source: P.A. 93-829, eff. 7-28-04.)